Utah statutes.
31A-22-618.   Nondiscrimination among health care professionals.

(1)  Except as provided under Section 31A-22-617, and except as to insurers licensed under Chapter 8, no insurer may unfairly discriminate against any licensed class of health care providers by structuring contract exclusions which exclude payment of benefits for the treatment of any illness, injury, or condition by any licensed class of health care providers when the treatment is within the scope of the licensee's practice and the illness, injury, or condition falls within the coverage of the contract.  Upon the written request of an insured alleging an insurer has violated this section, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to determine if the violation exists.  The commissioner may consolidate two or more related alleged violations into a single hearing.

(2)  This section does not apply to catastrophic mental health coverage provided in accordance with Section 31A-22-625.



Amended by Chapter 267, 2000 General Session

